Nebraska, session 109, LB962A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB962A LB962A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $1 from the General Fund
for FY2026-27 and (2) $1 from the General Fund for FY2027-28 to the
Supreme Court, for Program 52, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 962, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session,
2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $1 for
FY2026-27 or $1 for FY2027-28.
-2-